Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1521
Bridges over streams; construction; maintenance; expense borne by county.

In counties under township organization the expense of building, maintaining, and repairing bridges over streams on all public roads of the county or township shall be borne exclusively by the county within which such bridges are located.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 21, p. 522.